Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.430

Hold order on damaged, infested, or infected horticultural plants or Christmas trees—Selling or moving unlawful. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

When the director has cause to believe that any horticultural plants or Christmas trees are damaged or are infested or infected by any plant pest, the director may issue a hold order on such horticultural plants or Christmas trees. A hold order may prescribe conditions under which the damaged, infested, or infected material must be held to prevent spread of the infestation or infection. Treatment or other corrective measures shall be the sole responsibility of the persons holding the material for sale. It is unlawful to sell or move such plants until released in writing by the director.

[ 2007 c 335 s 14; 2000 c 144 s 22; 1993 c 120 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 19.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.430

Hold order on damaged, infested, or infected plants—Selling or moving unlawful. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

When the director has cause to believe that any horticultural plants are damaged or are infested or infected by any plant pest, the director may issue a hold order on such horticultural plants. A hold order may prescribe conditions under which plants must be held to prevent spread of the infestation or infection. Treatment or other corrective measures shall be the sole responsibility of the persons holding the plant material for sale. It is unlawful to sell or move such plants until released in writing by the director.

[ 2000 c 144 s 22; 1993 c 120 s 14; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 19.]